src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Consonant gradation r:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
r:0 <=> Vow: ( [ b|j|v ] ) _ r Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8 rr:r, S9 brr etc.
		Vow:           _ º: r        Vow: (%>:) (»:) Ø5:               ; 

"Consonant gradation v:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
v:0 <=> Vow: ( [ j|l|r ] ) _ v Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S8 , S9 jvv etc.
		Vow:           _ º: v        Vow: (%>:) (»:) Ø5:               ; 

"Consonant gradation j:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
j:0 <=> Vow: [b|r] _ j Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S9
		Vow:           _ º: j        Vow: (%>:) (»:) Ø5:               ; 

"Consonant gradation t:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
t:0 <=> Vow: [j|ñ|ń|ŋ|r|v] _ t             Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;             ! S9 jtt:jt etc.
    	Vow: [b|j|r|v]     _ t j           Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;           ! S9
      	Vow: [b|j|v|r]     _ t s           Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;           ! S9
    	Vow:       h:      _ t ( [ j|s ] ) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! S4 htt(j)
        Vow:       t:s     _ j (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]  ;                                 ! Word final weakening of -ttj to -sj
        Vow (%>:) (»:) (Dummy:) s     _ (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]   ;                           ! W-Final Cl. Simpl. málestit : máles
        Vow:       h:      _ t ( [ j|s ] ) Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ;               ! III-I special gradation
                                                  ! Second last rule will fail if and when clitics are added to the word.
                                                  ! Note that there is no weak grade clitic here.

!"Gradation Series 4, II-I, h Loss 1"
!!€ oajváladtj#
!!€ oajvála0sj#

!h:0 <=> Vow: _ [ k: | p: | t: ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!        Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ; ! Deleting Final Cns in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables

"Gradation Series 4, II-I, tj and ts"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 h:0 <=> Vow: _ [ k: | p: | t: ] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         Vow: _ t [j|s] Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
         Vow: _ t: t: ( [ j|s ] ) Vow: (%>:) (»:) X6: ; ! III-I special gradation
         Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ; ! Deleting Final Cns in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables
! (t:) for III-I CG)

!"Word final double consonant simplification"
!Cy:0 <=> Vow: Cx: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
!     where Cx in ( s )
!	   Cy in ( s )
!	   matched ;
! Moved to the CG chapter. But does this rule wait for more cases?



!! ### Change rules

!! The Cx:Cy format was kept for hk:g, hp:b, ht:d, since the left context h:0 was unique, 
!! and no compilation conflict thus arose.

!! The bb:pp, gg:kk, dd:tt alternations were split into three rules, 
!! since keeping them in one Cx:Cy rule created compilation conflicts. 
!! Also, d:t contain a rule not found for the other two...


"Gradation Series 4, II-I"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow: h:0 _ Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
 where Cx in ( k p t )
       Cy in ( g b d )
       matched ;

!"Gradation Series 5, III-II, dtj, dts"
! d:t <=> Vow: (»:) _ t Cx Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( j s ) ;

"bb:pp"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
b:p <=> Vow:    _ b:  Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
        Vow: b: _     Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!       Vow:    _ (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]0 ;  ! This gives Jakob:Jakop, and it is unclear what it gives.
! The last rule is for unnep : unnebu. It must be revised in two ways:
! a. it should be extended to more consonants
! b. it should be restricted, perhaps b should be replaced with b8

!!€ oabbáQ1
!!€ oappá0

"gg:kk"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
g:k <=> Vow:    _ g: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
  	    Vow: g: _ Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;

!!€ vággeQ1
!!€ vákke0

!!$ vággeQ1
!!$ vágge0


"g:k change for clitic -ge"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
g:k => Vow: (%>:) (»:) (Dummy:) #  _ e: .#.  ; !clitic ge:k

"dd:tt and dtj, dts"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:t <=> Vow: _ d: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	Vow: d: _  Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	Vow: (»:) _ t [ j|s ] (%>:) (»:) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;


!"Gradation Series 6, III-II, bb, gg 1"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ Cz: Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( b d g )
!       Cy in ( p t k )
!       Cz in ( b d g )
!       matched ;

!"Gradation Series 6, III-II, bb, gg 2"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: :Cy _ Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
! where Cx in ( b d g )
!       Cy in ( p t k )
!       matched ;

"Gradation Series 7, III-II, ks(t), kt, ktj, kts"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 k:v <=> Vow: _   [ s|t|l ] (t) Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
	     Vow: _ t [ j|s ]       Vow: ( StemCns: ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;

!! Exceptional II-III inverse gradation in present participles
! -----------------------------------------------------------

!! This gradation is only for II-I syllable verbs that get III as
!! present participles.

!! Candidates:

!! * bbm - bm - m
!! * ddn - dn - n
!! * ddnj- dnj- nj
!! * ggŋ - gŋ - ŋ
!! * ddj - dj - dj
   
!! * hkk - hk - g
!! * hpp - hp - b
    
!! * htt - ht - d
!! * httj- htj- tj
!! * htts- hts- ts

!! Strategy: Do insertion rule for the initial element.

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with bm, gŋ"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 0:Cx <=> :Vow      Cx _ Cy           Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ;
              where Cx in ( b g )
                    Cy in ( m ŋ )
	          matched ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with dn/j + as I-III strengthening gradation with d"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 0:d  <=> :Vow    d _ [ n | n j | j ] Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ;
          :Vow    d _                 Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with hk, hp,"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 0:Cx <=> :Vow h     Cx _             Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ;
               where Cx in ( k p ) ;

"Consonant insertion as II-III strengthening gradation with htt(j/s)"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 0:t  <=> :Vow h t _ ( j | s )        Vow: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ; !removed Q7, fixed in smj-lex


!"Facultative alternation snj-sjnj"
! __@RULENAME@__
!0:j => [ .#. | # ] s _ n j Vow ;

!"Acronym case vowel deletion for VC+V-final acronyms"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! a:0 <=> :CapVow :CapCns+ :CapVow %>: %:: _ [ Cns | .#. ] ;
!
!"Acronym nocase colon deletion for VC+V-final acronyms"
!%::0 <=> :CapVow :CapCns+ :CapVow %>: _ a:0 .#. ;
!
!"Acronym nocase morph border deletion for VC+V-final acronyms"
!%>:0 <=> :CapVow :CapCns+ :CapVow _ %:: a:0 .#. ;

!! Debugging of twol-rules

!! All rule conflicts have been successfully resolved. The rule file
!! should be kept that way. Look out for conflicts in the compilation
!! process, and resolve them as they appear!
